src/fst/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON names
Várharra indeclmal ;
Den% Danske% Bank%  indeclorg ;
SvF orgtag ;
OyÍF orgtag ;
LíF orgtag ;
VíF orgtag ;
Airways orgtag ;
Qaeda orgtag ;
Mustanoja surtagv ;
Laukka surtagv ;
Marsurka indeclplc ;
Tanila surtagv ;
Panula surtagv ;
Mizpa indeclplc ;
Sára SARA ;
Delta indeclplc ;
Kaseva surtagv ;
Titanic vehtag ;
Løveid surtagc ;
Frida:Frid ASTA ;
Haraldur:Harald DAGUR ;
Ewald maltag ;
Róaldur:Róald DAGUR ;
Tórhild RUT ;
Ellindur:Ellind DAGUR ;
Oyvindur:Oyvind TRÓNDUR ;
Gundur:Gund TRÓNDUR ;
Sigmundur:Sigmund TRÓNDUR ;
Steinmundur:Steinmund DAGUR ;
Ámundur:Ámund DAGUR ;
Onundur:Onund TRÓNDUR ;
Tróndur:Trónd TRÓNDUR ;
InterSeafood orgtag ;
Halvard maltag ;
Friarfjord plctag ;
Bethesda:Bethesd ASTA ;
The indeclattr ;
Goethe RUT ;
Dyveke RUT ;
Folke surtagv ;
Jyske orgtag ;
Kyrene plctag ;
Signe RUT ;
Anne RUT ;
Fenre surtagv ;
Beate RUT ;
Kol-Hoze orgtag ;
Wisløff surtagc ;
Ingulf maltag ;
Fór% eg indeclplc ;
Sigga:Sigg ASTA ;
Solveig RUT ;
Helgi:Helg ARI ;
Henningur:Henning DAGUR ;
Statsskog plctag ;
Bjorberg surtagc ;
Gunnlaug RUT ;
Stígur:Stíg DAGUR ;
Nikolai maltag ;
Keiski surtagv ;
Dagali plctag ;
Natalia:Natali ASTA ;
Tiuraniemi surtagv ;
Mumi indeclplc ;
Tomperi surtagv ;
Vivi RUT ;
Ørnhøi surtagv ;
Amalja:Amalj ASTA ;
Annika:Annik ASTA ;
Stein-Erik maltag ;
Tíðrikur:Tíðrik DAGUR ;
Hellvik surtagc ;
Fagervik plctag ;
Bjarki:Bjark ARI ;
Eibydal plctag ;
Sosialurin:Sosial SOSIALURIN ;
Arsenal orgtag ;
Serubbabel maltag ;
Áila:Áil ASTA ;
Náhkol maltag ;
Sørli:Sørl ARI ;
Poula:Poul ASTA ;
Remi:Rem ARI ;
Brækhus-Hærem surtagc ;
Mizráim maltag ;
Bochum plctag ;
Víggrímur:Víggrím DAGUR ;
Tapani:Tapan ARI ;
Eihaugen plctag ;
Belgien indeclplc ;
Italien indeclplc ;
Kroepelien surtagc ;
Wacken indeclplc ;
Ketolainen surtagc ;
Nikkonen surtagc ;
Elmgren surtagc ;
Sundhedsstyrelsen orgtag ;
Storforsen surtagc ;
Skoltefossen plctag ;
Vagnur:Vagn DAGUR ;
Hallstein maltag ;
Regina:Regin ASTA ;
Berlin:Berlin indeclplc ;
Nanna:Nann ASTA ;
Giovanni:Giovann ARI ;
Torfinnur:Torfinn DAGUR ;
Hjerkinn surtagc ;
Jorunn RUT ;
Articon indeclplc ;
Antoni:Anton ARI ;
Oddbjørn BJØRN ;
Vebjørn BJØRN ;
Sigbjørn BJØRN ;
Hildibjørn BJØRN ;
Valbjørn BJØRN ;
Kolbjørn BJØRN ;
Sólbjørn BJØRN ;
Sveinbjørn BJØRN ;
Mannbjørn BJØRN ;
Gunnbjørn BJØRN ;
Geirbjørn BJØRN ;
Tórbjørn BJØRN ;
Snæbjørn BJØRN ;
Jarfjordbotn plctag ;
Kartni:Kartn ARI ;
Símun BOAS ;
Keypmannhavn fplctag ;
Siao WILLY ;
Marco WILLY ;
Theo WILLY ;
Urho WILLY ;
Reijo WILLY ;
Iskko WILLY ;
Hautsalo surtagv ;
Karlo WILLY ;
Rino WILLY ;
Sampo WILLY ;
Roberto WILLY ;
Ari:Ar ARI ;
Idar maltag ;
Hágar SARA ;
Hera:Her ASTA ;
Hooker surtagc ;
Ebenezer indeclplc ;
Akbor maltag ;
Harri:Harr HARRIGUD ;
Torri:Torr ARI ;
Pinehas plctag ;
Grias BOAS ;
Niklas BOAS ;
Arkimedes maltag ;
Heródes BOAS ;
Undis RUT ;
Elis BOAS ;
Sakaris BOAS ;
Statens orgtag ;
Fýrapens indeclplc ;
Maurits maltag ;
Emaus indeclplc ;
Amadeus BOAS ;
Morpheus BOAS ;
Julius BOAS ;
Nemus BOAS ;
Jordaneanus BOAS ;
Filippus BOAS ;
Fortanatus BOAS ;
Ási:Ás ARI ;
Norðís indeclplc ;
Rósa:Rós ASTA ;
Sighvatur:Sighvat DAGUR ;
Huitfeldt surtagc ;
Beattet plctag ;
Hjørtur:Hjørt TRÓNDUR ;
Trøstur:Trøst TRÓNDUR ;
Iisko-Matti:Iisko-Matt ARI ;
Birgitta:Birgitt ASTA ;
Jerkku surtagv ;
Esav maltag ;
Brynleivur:Brynleiv DAGUR ;
Sørkvi:Sørkv ARI ;
Tjóðolvur:Tjóðolv DAGUR ;
Dávur:Dáv DÁVUR ;
Bobby WILLY ;
Lilly RUT ;
Villy WILLY ;
Ronny WILLY ;
Berry WILLY ;
Hyyppä plctag ;
Durið RUT ;
Hallvarður:Hallvarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Bjarnvarður:Bjarnvarð TRÓNDUR ;
Hervarður:Hervarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Jatvarður:Jatvarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Hávarður:Hávarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Eyðvarður:Eyðvarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Sigurður:Sigurð TRÓNDUR ;
Bárður:Bárð TRÓNDUR ;
Hórður:Hórð TRÓNDUR ;
Tórður:Tórð TRÓNDUR ;
Sjúrður:Sjúrð TRÓNDUR ;
Hermóður:Hermóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Tormóður:Tormóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Ásmóður:Ásmóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Rói:Ró ARI ;
Daga MUSTAFA ;
Olja MUSTAFA ;
Deana MUSTAFA ;
Chrisina MUSTAFA ;
Vesa MUSTAFA ;
Sunnuva MUSTAFA ;
Anna-Elisabeth MUSTAFA ;
Bjari MUSTAFA ;
Lütken MUSTAFA ;
Yoon MUSTAFA ;
Frøstrup MUSTAFA ;
Tómasdóttir MUSTAFA ;
Osvør MUSTAFA ;
Sunrit MUSTAFA ;
Divvun:Divvun orgtag ;
